src/fst/affixes/noun_affixes.lexc
! Blackfoot Regular Noun Inflectional Morphology

! Blackfoot Regular Noun Inflectional Morphology

LEXICON NOUN_PREFIXES
@R.pos.NOUN@ NOUN_INDEP_PREFIXES ;
@R.pos.NOUN@ NOUN_SHORT_PREFIXES ;
@R.pos.VERBALIZE@ VERBALIZED_PREFIX_SETS ; 

LEXICON NOUN_INDEP_PREFIXES
@P.person.NI@:@P.person.NI@nit%<    PRE_INDEP_FLAG ;
@P.person.KI@:@P.person.KI@kit%<    PRE_INDEP_FLAG ;
@P.person.OT@:@P.person.OT@ot%<     PRE_INDEP_FLAG ;
@P.person.NULL@0                    PRE_INDEP_FLAG ;

LEXICON PRE_INDEP_FLAG
@P.class.NOUN@ PRENOUNS ;
@P.class.VERB@ PREFIXES ;

! LEXICON NON_INDEP_FLAG
! PRENOUNS ;

LEXICON NOUN_SHORT_PREFIXES
@P.person.NI@:@P.person.NI@n%<    DEP_STEMS ;
@P.person.KI@:@P.person.KI@k%<    DEP_STEMS ;
@P.person.OT@:@P.person.OT@w%<    DEP_STEMS ;
 
LEXICON BOUND
0:%< PV_COUNTER ;

LEXICON PV_COUNTER
@D.pvcount@@P.pvcount.1@ PRENOUNS ;
@R.pvcount.1@@P.pvcount.2@ PRENOUNS ;
@R.pvcount.2@@P.pvcount.3@ PRENOUNS ;
@R.pvcount.3@@P.pvcount.4@ PRENOUNS ;
@R.pvcount.4@@P.pvcount.5@ PRENOUNS ;
@R.pvcount.5@@P.pvcount.6@ PRENOUNS ;

!!!!! After this, we collect the stems !!!!!

! Blackfoot Regular Noun Stems

! Below are the INDEPENDENT noun stems and their allomorphic forms (only if the allomorph is irregular). 

LEXICON NOUN_STEMS
@P.pos.NA@ INDEP_NA_STEMS ;
@P.pos.NI@ INDEP_NI_STEMS ;
@P.pos.VAI@ INDEP_NA_STEMS ;
@P.pos.VII@ INDEP_NI_STEMS ;

LEXICON DEP_STEMS
@P.pos.NA@ DEP_NA_STEMS ;
@P.pos.NI@ DEP_NI_STEMS ;

!!!!! After this, we collect the stems !!!!!

LEXICON NA
@R.pos.NOUN@+NA:@R.pos.NOUN@0  NA_0_IM ;
@R.pos.VERBALIZE@+VAI:@R.pos.VERBALIZE@0 NOUN_VAI_SUFFIXES ;

! LEXICON NA_SG
! @P.number.SG@+NA:@P.number.SG@  NA_0_IM ;
! @R.class.VERB@+VAI@R.class.VERB@:0 VAI_SUFFIXES ;

! LEXICON NA_PL
! @P.number.PL@+NA:@P.number.PL@  NA_0_IM ;
! @R.class.VERB@+VAI@R.class.VERB@:0 VAI_SUFFIXES ;

LEXICON NA_IM
@P.im.IM@@R.pos.NOUN@+NA:@P.in.IM@@R.pos.NOUN@  NA_0_IM ;
@R.pos.VERBALIZE@+VAI:@R.pos.VERBALIZE@0 VAI_SUFFIXES ;

! LEXICON NA_SG_IM
! @P.number.SG@@P.im.IM@+NA:@P.number.SG@@P.im.IM@  NA_0_IM ;
! @R.class.VERB@+VAI:@R.class.VERB@0 VAI_SUFFIXES ;

! LEXICON NA_PL_IM
! @P.number.PL@@P.im.IM@+NA:@P.number.PL@@P.im.IM@  NA_0_IM ;
! @R.class.VERB@+VAI:@R.class.VERB@0 VAI_SUFFIXES ;

LEXICON NI
@R.pos.NOUN@+NI:@R.pos.NOUN@0  NA_0_IM ;
@R.pos.VERBALIZE@+VII:@R.pos.VERBALIZE@0 VII_SUFFIXES ;

! LEXICON NI_SG
! @P.number.SG@+NI:@P.number.SG@  NI_POSS_NUM ;
! @R.class.VERB@+VII@R.class.VERB@:0 VII_SUFFIXES ;

! LEXICON NI_PL
! @P.number.PL@+NI:@P.number.PL@  NI_POSS_NUM ;
! @R.class.VERB@+VII@R.class.VERB@:0 VII_SUFFIXES ;

LEXICON NI_IM
@P.im.IM@@R.pos.NOUN@+NI:@P.im.IM@@R.pos.NOUN@0  NI_POSS_NUM ;
@R.pos.VERBALIZE@+VII@R.pos.VERBALIZE@:0 VII_SUFFIXES ;

! LEXICON NI_SG_IM
! @P.number.SG@@P.im.IM@+NI:@P.number.SG@@P.im.IM@  NI_POSS_NUM ;
! @R.class.VERB@+VII@R.class.VERB@:0 VII_SUFFIXES ;

! LEXICON NI_PL_IM
! @P.number.PL@@P.im.IM@+NI:@P.number.PL@@P.im.IM@  NI_POSS_NUM ;
! @R.class.VERB@+VII@R.class.VERB@:0 VII_SUFFIXES ;

LEXICON NAD
+NAD:0  NA_0_IM ;

! LEXICON NAD_SG
! @P.number.SG@+NAD:@P.number.SG@  NA_0_IM ;

! LEXICON NAD_PL
! @P.number.PL@+NAD:@P.number.PL@  NA_0_IM ;

LEXICON NAD_IM
@P.im.IM@+NAD:@P.im.IM@  NA_0_IM ;

! LEXICON NAD_SG_IM
! @P.number.SG@@P.im.IM@+NAD:@P.number.SG@@P.im.IM@  NA_0_IM ;

! LEXICON NAD_PL_IM
! @P.number.PL@@P.im.IM@+NAD:@P.number.PL@@P.im.IM@  NA_0_IM ;

LEXICON NID
+NID:0  NI_POSS_NUM ;

! LEXICON NID_SG
! @P.number.SG@+NID:@P.number.SG@  NI_POSS_NUM ;

! LEXICON NID_PL
! @P.number.PL@+NID:@P.number.PL@  NI_POSS_NUM ;

LEXICON NID_IM
@P.im.IM@+NID:@P.im.IM@  NI_POSS_NUM ;

! LEXICON NID_SG_IM
! @P.number.SG@@P.im.IM@+NID:@P.number.SG@@P.im.IM@  NI_POSS_NUM ;

! LEXICON NID_PL_IM
! @P.number.PL@@P.im.IM@+NID:@P.number.PL@@P.im.IM@  NI_POSS_NUM ;

! Below is the combinatorial PARADIGM for the possessive circumfixes

! POSS+stem+POSS+NUM
! POSS+stem+POSS+OBV
! stem+NUM
! stem+OBV

LEXICON NA_0_IM
@D.person.NULL@@R.im.IM@:@D.person.NULL@@R.im.IM@%>im NA_POSS ;
@D.person.NULL@@D.im.IM@                              NA_POSS ;
@R.person.NULL@                                       NA_POSS ;

LEXICON NA_POSS
! Singular possessors
@U.person.NI@+Px1Sg:@U.person.NI@0   NA_NUMBER_OBV_SUFFIXES ;
@U.person.KI@+Px2Sg:@U.person.KI@0   NA_NUMBER_OBV_SUFFIXES ;
@U.person.OT@+Px3Sg:@U.person.OT@0   NA_NUMBER_OBV_SUFFIXES ;
@U.person.NULL@:@U.person.NULL@      NA_NUMBER_OBV_SUFFIXES ;
! Plural possessors
@U.person.NI@+Px1Pl:@U.person.NI@%>innaan  NA_NUMBER_OBV_SUFFIXES ;
@U.person.KI@+Px21Pl:@U.person.KI@%>innoon NA_NUMBER_OBV_SUFFIXES ;
@U.person.KI@+Px2Pl:@U.person.KI@%>oaawa   NA_NUMBER_OBV_SUFFIXES ;
@U.person.OT@+Px3Pl:@U.person.OT@%>oaawa   NA_NUMBER_OBV_SUFFIXES ;

! Below is the set of verb suffixes that occur when a noun undergoes the verbalization process. (aakiiyiwa-she is a woman).
! They are only instransitive verbs. Somethings to note. I have only included the person suffixes, not the derivational suffixes.
! This verb paradigm does not include dependent nouns.

LEXICON NOUN_VAI_SUFFIXES
@R.mode.IND@+Ind:@R.mode.IND@ INDEP_VAI_SUFFIXES ;
@R.mode.CON@+Cnj:@R.mode.CON@ CONJ_VAI_SUFFIXES ;
@R.mode.SUB@+Sbj:@R.mode.SUB@ SUBJ_VAI_SUFFIXES ;
@R.mode.IRR@+Irr:@R.mode.IRR@ UNREAL_VAI_SUFFIXES ;
@R.mode.IMP@+Imp:@R.mode.IMP@ IMP_VAI_SUFFIXES ;

LEXICON INDEP_VAI_SUFFIXES
! Third Person Interrogatives
@R.person.NULL@+3Sg+INTERR:@R.person.NULL@%>waatsiksi # ;
@R.person.NULL@+3Pl+INTERR:@R.person.NULL@%>waiksaawa # ;
! Singular INDEPENDENT
@R.person.NI@+1Sg:@R.person.NI@yi   	ANIM_INTERR ;	
@R.person.KI@+2Sg:@R.person.KI@yi   		ANIM_INTERR ;
@R.person.NULL@+3Sg:@R.person.NULL@%>wa		ENCLITICS ;
@R.person.NULL@+4Sg:@R.person.NULL@%>yini   	ENCLITICS ; ! Unknown, but following Frantz regarding the third person.
! Plural INDEPENDENT
@R.person.NI@+1Pl:@R.person.NI@%>yihpinnaana  ANIM_INTERR ;	
@R.person.NULL@+21Pl:@R.person.NULL@%>yio'pa	 ANIM_INTERR ;	
@R.person.KI@+2Pl:@R.person.KI@%>yihpoaawa	 ANIM_INTERR ;  	
@R.person.NULL@+3Pl:@R.person.NULL@%>yi		ENCLITICS ;
@R.person.NULL@+4Pl:@R.person.NULL@%>yi   	ENCLITICS ;

LEXICON CONJ_VAI_SUFFIXES
! Singular CONJUNCTIVE
@R.person.NI@+1Sg:@R.person.NI@%>yihsi   	ENCLITICS ; 
@R.person.KI@+2Sg:@R.person.KI@%>yihsi  	ENCLITICS ;
@R.person.OT@+3Sg:@R.person.OT@%>yihsi 		ENCLITICS ;
@R.person.NULL@+4Sg:@R.person.NULL@%>yihsi   	ENCLITICS ;
! Plural CONJUNCTIVE
@R.person.NI@+1Pl:@R.person.NI@%>yihsinnaana  ENCLITICS ;
@R.person.NI@+1Pl:@R.person.NI@%>yihsinnaan  ENCLITICS ;
@R.person.NULL@+21Pl:@R.person.NULL@%>yihsi 	 ENCLITICS ;
@R.person.KI@+2Pl:@R.person.KI@%>yihsoaayi	 ENCLITICS ;  
@R.person.OT@+3Pl:@R.person.OT@%>yihsi	ENCLITICS ;	
@R.person.NULL@+4Pl:@R.person.NULL@%>yihsi	ENCLITICS ;

LEXICON SUBJ_VAI_SUFFIXES
! Singular SUBJUNCTIVE
@R.person.NULL@+1Sg:@R.person.NULL@%>yiniki   	ENCLITICS ;
@R.person.NULL@+2Sg:@R.person.NULL@%>yiniki   	ENCLITICS ;
@R.person.NULL@+3Sg:@R.person.NULL@%>yisi   	ENCLITICS ;
@R.person.NULL@+4Sg:@R.person.NULL@%>yisi   	ENCLITICS ;
! Plural SUBJUNCTIVE
@R.person.NULL@+1Pl:@R.person.NULL@%>yinnaaniki  ENCLITICS ;
@R.person.NULL@+21Pl:@R.person.NULL@%>yinoainiki ENCLITICS ;	
@R.person.NULL@+2Pl:@R.person.NULL@%>yio'ki 		ENCLITICS ;
@R.person.NULL@+3Pl:@R.person.NULL@%>yisi			ENCLITICS ;
@R.person.NULL@+4Pl:@R.person.NULL@%>yisi			ENCLITICS ;

LEXICON UNREAL_VAI_SUFFIXES
! Singular UNREAL
@R.person.NI@+1Sg:@R.person.NI@%>yihtopi   	ENCLITICS ;
@R.person.KI@+2Sg:@R.person.KI@%>yihtopi   	ENCLITICS ;
@R.person.NULL@+3Sg:@R.person.NULL@%>yiwahtopi	ENCLITICS ;
@R.person.NULL@+4Sg:@R.person.NULL@%>yiwahtopini   ENCLITICS ;	
! Plural UNREAL
@R.person.NI@+1Pl:@R.person.NI@%>yihpinnaanopi  ENCLITICS ;
@R.person.NULL@+21Pl:@R.person.NULL@%>yihpoaawopi 	ENCLITICS ;	
@R.person.KI@+2Pl:@R.person.KI@%>yiwahtopiyi	ENCLITICS ;   
@R.person.NULL@+3Pl:@R.person.NULL@%>yiwahtopiyi	ENCLITICS ;
@R.person.NULL@+4Pl:@R.person.NULL@%>yiwahtopiyini    ENCLITICS ;

LEXICON PRENOUNS
0 NOUN_STEMS ;
PV/ááhkamá'p+:%^SPááhkamá'p BOUND ;
PV/aahksikkam+:%^SPaahksikkam BOUND ;
PV/aaksta'+:aaksta' BOUND ;
PV/ai'tamáak+:ai'tamáak BOUND ;
PV/akisspí+:akisspí BOUND ;
PV/akoksska+:akoksska BOUND ;
PV/ama+:ama BOUND ;
PV/anaw+:anaw BOUND ;
PV/ano+:anow BOUND ;
PV/anow+:anow BOUND ;
PV/apa'p+:apa'p BOUND ;
PV/assaak+:assaak BOUND ;
PV/awa'+:awa' BOUND ;
PV/i'sskaan+:i2'sskaan BOUND ;
PV/ihta+:ihtaw BOUND ;
PV/iiht+:iiht BOUND ;
PV/iihtsitssitak+:iihtsitssitak BOUND ;
PV/iikska'+:iikska' BOUND ;
PV/iimaa+:i3maa BOUND ;
PV/iimá+:iimá BOUND ;
PV/iina+:iina BOUND ;
PV/iinatt+:iinatt BOUND ;
PV/iinik+:iinik BOUND ;
PV/iitsiksist+:iitsiksist BOUND ;
PV/iiyik+:iiyik BOUND ;
PV/ika'to+:i2ka'to BOUND ;
PV/ikaiksist+:i2kaiksist BOUND ;
PV/ikamo't+:ikamo't BOUND ;
PV/ikayiss+:ikayiss BOUND ;
PV/ikihkiht+:ikihkiht BOUND ;
PV/ikimmat+:i2kimmat BOUND ;
PV/ikippa'+:i2kippa' BOUND ;
PV/ikkan+:ikkan BOUND ;
PV/ikkihkini+:ikkihkini BOUND ;
PV/iksissto+:i2ksissto BOUND ;
PV/iksksowa'+:iksksowa' BOUND ;
PV/ikstsina'+:ikstsina' BOUND ;
PV/ikíppoa+:ikíppoa BOUND ;
PV/imak+:imak BOUND ;
PV/inai't+:inai't BOUND ;
PV/innaahkoot+:innaahkoot BOUND ;
PV/ipahtsik+:i2pahtsik BOUND ;
PV/ipana+:ipana BOUND ;
PV/ipapa+:ipapa BOUND ;
PV/ipiitsiy+:%^SPi2piitsiy BOUND ;
PV/ipoina+:ipoina BOUND ;
PV/ippoa+:ippoa BOUND ;
PV/ipákkssa+:i2pákkssa BOUND ;
PV/isk+:isk BOUND ;
PV/ist+:ist BOUND ;
PV/istsa'+:i2stsa' BOUND ;
PV/isttssi+:i2sttssi BOUND ;
PV/iton+:iton BOUND ;
PV/iámoohk+:iámoohk BOUND ;
PV/kan+:hkan BOUND ;
PV/kotski+:i2kotski BOUND ;
PV/káátsisto+:káátsisto BOUND ;
PV/máttsit+:%^SPmáttsit BOUND ;
PV/mato+:mato BOUND ;
PV/miistap+:miistap BOUND ;
PV/mo'tóí+:mo'tóí BOUND ;
PV/naat+:%^SPnaat BOUND ;
PV/niitsi+:niitsi BOUND ;
PV/noohkátt+:%^SPnoohkátt BOUND ;
PV/o'kio+:o'kio BOUND ;
PV/ohkana+:ohkana BOUND ;
PV/ohpii+:ohpii BOUND ;
PV/ohpok+:ohpok BOUND ;
PV/oka'p+:oka'p BOUND ;
PV/omanista+:omanista BOUND ;
PV/omo'tap+:omo'tap BOUND ;
PV/omá+:omá BOUND ;
PV/onaki+:onaki BOUND ;
PV/oohkatt+:oohkatt BOUND ;
PV/otomohk+:otomohk BOUND ;
PV/po'kí+:po'kí BOUND ;
PV/sa+:saw BOUND ;
PV/saipa'+:saipa' BOUND ;
PV/sootam+:i2sootam BOUND ;
PV/sska'+:sska' BOUND ;
PV/sstok+:sstok BOUND ;
PV/ssáak+:i2ssáak BOUND ;
PV/waahki+:waahki BOUND ;
PV/waahtso+:waahtso BOUND ;
PV/waanook+:waanook BOUND ;
PV/wáyák+:wáyák BOUND ;
PV/yook+:yook BOUND ;
PV/áka+:áka BOUND ;
PV/ááhkamá'p+:ááhkamá'p BOUND ;
PV/íka+:íka BOUND ;
PN/aaká+:aaká	BOUND ;
PN/áápi+:áápi	BOUND ;
PN/aká+:aká	BOUND ;
PN/apak+:apak	BOUND ;
PN/ayaam+:ayaam	BOUND ;
PN/i'tsin+:i'tsin	BOUND ;
PN/iinohk+:iinohk	BOUND ;
PN/ikaw+:ikaw	BOUND ;
PN/iki'ta+:i2ki'ta	BOUND ;
PN/ikkak+:ikkak	BOUND ;
PN/iksi's+:iksi's	BOUND ;
PN/iksim+:iksim	BOUND ;
PN/iksisto+:i2ksisto	BOUND ;
PN/inap+:inap	BOUND ;
PN/inno+:i2nno	BOUND ;
PN/ipahp+:ipahp	BOUND ;
PN/ipahtsi+:i2pahtsi	BOUND ;
PN/ipisat+:ipisat	BOUND ;
PN/ippat+:ippat	BOUND ;
PN/isakoow+:isakoow	BOUND ;
PN/iss+:iss	BOUND ;
PN/isspik+:isspik	BOUND ;
PN/isttohk+:isttohk	BOUND ;
PN/itapiksst+:itapiksst	BOUND ;
PN/itsin+:itsin	BOUND ;
PN/kiihtsip+:kiihtsip	BOUND ;
PN/ksis+:ksis	BOUND ;
PN/máóhk+:máóhk	BOUND ;
PN/mattsi+:mattsi	BOUND ;
PN/míístap+:míístap	BOUND ;
PN/naam+:naam	BOUND ;
PN/naatsa+:naatsa	BOUND ;
PN/nimm+:nimm	BOUND ;
PN/o't+:o't	BOUND ;
PN/o'totam+:o'totam	BOUND ;
PN/ohkit+:ohkit	BOUND ;
PN/ohpo+:ohpo	BOUND ;
PN/ohsohkat+:ohsohkat	BOUND ;
PN/okaki+:okaki	BOUND ;
PN/omatap+:omatap	BOUND ;
PN/oohsi+:oohsi	BOUND ;
PN/opi+:opi	BOUND ;
PN/otats+:otats	BOUND ;
PN/ótssko+:ótssko	BOUND ;
PN/paahksíst+:paahksíst	BOUND ;
PN/pinááp+:pi2nááp	BOUND ;
PN/sa+:sa	BOUND ;
PN/saayippom+:saayippom	BOUND ;
PN/sainnis+:sainnis	BOUND ;
PN/sako+:sako	BOUND ;
PN/sata+:sata	BOUND ;
PN/sayippom+:sayippom	BOUND ;
PN/sikim+:i2sikim	BOUND ;
PN/sistsik+:i2sistsik	BOUND ;
PN/sohk+:sohk	BOUND ;
PN/sopow+:i2sopow	BOUND ;
PN/ssk+:ssk	BOUND ;
PN/sskonát+:i2sskonát	BOUND ;
PN/sspik+:sspik	BOUND ;
PN/wa'kot+:wa'kot	BOUND ;
PN/waaist+:waaist	BOUND ;
PN/waamohs+:waamohs	BOUND ;
PN/waaniit+:waaniit	BOUND ;
PN/waapo'k+:waapo'k	BOUND ;
PN/waawow+:waawow	BOUND ;
PN/yááhs+:yááhs	BOUND ;
PN/yaam+:yaam	BOUND ;
PN/yoohk+:yoohk	BOUND ;
